District of Columbia statutes.
1-1061.14

Confirmation of receipt of application and voted ballot.

The Board shall implement an electronic free-access system by which a covered voter may determine by telephone, electronic mail, or Internet whether:

(1)

The voter’s federal postcard application or other registration or military-overseas ballot application has been received and accepted; and

(2)

The voter’s military-overseas ballot has been received and the current status of the ballot.

June 5, 2012, D.C. Law 19-137, § 114, 59 DCR 2542

History

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 14 of the Uniform Military and Overseas Voters Act.

Editor's Notes